Tennessee, session 114, SB1570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-105, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting the following:
The commissioner shall promulgate rules that establish procedures for the
payment of indemnities for animals destroyed under the authority of this chapter.
Subject to the availability of funds, an indemnity payment under this section must be
based on, but is not limited to, the value of the destroyed animal. The commissioner
may deny an indemnification payment for an animal's owner who is in violation of this
part.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-102(6), is amended by deleting
"owner of such animal" and substituting "state".
SECTION 3. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1570
010195
- 1 -